Texas, session 892, HB21.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 31.031(b), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  If the individual fails to make a payment, including the first payment, before the applicable date provided by Subsection (a-1), the unpaid installment is delinquent and incurs [a] penalty [of six percent] and interest as provided by Section 33.01(c). The penalty provided by Section 33.01(a) does not apply to the unpaid installment. SECTION 2.  Section 31.032(c), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  If the person fails to make a payment before the applicable date provided by Subsection (b), the unpaid installment is delinquent and incurs [a] penalty [of six percent] and interest as provided by Section 33.01(c). SECTION 3.  Sections 33.01(a), (b), and (c), Tax Code, are amended to read as follows: (a)  A delinquent tax incurs a penalty of three [six] percent of the amount of the tax for the first calendar month it is delinquent plus one-half [one] percent for each additional month or portion of a month the tax remains unpaid prior to July 1 of the year in which it becomes delinquent. However, a tax delinquent on July 1 incurs a total penalty of six [twelve] percent of the amount of the delinquent tax without regard to the number of months the tax has been delinquent. A delinquent tax continues to incur the penalty provided by this subsection as long as the tax remains unpaid, regardless of whether a judgment for the delinquent tax has been rendered. (b)  If a person who exercises the split-payment option provided by Section 31.03 [of this code] fails to make the second payment before July 1, the second payment is delinquent and incurs a penalty of six [twelve] percent of the amount of unpaid tax. (c)  A delinquent tax accrues simple interest at a rate of one-half [one] percent for each month or portion of a month the tax remains unpaid. Interest payable under this section is to compensate the taxing unit for revenue lost because of the delinquency. A delinquent tax continues to accrue interest under this subsection as long as the tax remains unpaid, regardless of whether a judgment for the delinquent tax has been rendered. SECTION 4.   The changes in law made by this Act apply only to penalties and interest that accrue on or after the effective date of this Act. Penalties and interest that accrued before the effective date of this Act are governed by the law in effect when the penalties and interest accrued, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.